en: Broadhead tip type: Bullet; Carbide; Chisel tip; Cut-on-contact; Hybrid; Pointed; Tanto; Trocar tip; Other
fi: Leikkaavan kärjen malli: Luoti; Kovametalli; Talttakärki; Leikkaava kärki; Hybridi; Terävä; Tanto; Troakaarikärki; Muu
th: ประเภทปลายหัวลูกธนู: ทรงหัวกระสุน; คาร์ไบด์; หัวทรงสิ่ว; เฉือนเมื่อกระทบ; ไฮบริด; ปลายแหลม; ทรงทันโตะ; หัวตัดสามเหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
de: Typ der Jagdspitze: Kugel; Karbid; Meißelspitze; Cut-on-Contact; Hybrid; Spitz; Tanto; Trokar-Spitze; Sonstiges
es: Tipo de punta de caza: Bala; Carburo; Punta de cincel; Corte al contacto; Híbrida; Puntiaguda; Tanto; Punta trócar; Otra
tr: Geniş uçlu ok ucu tipi: Mermi uç; Karbür; Keski uç; Temasla kesen; Hibrit; Sivri; Tanto; Trokar uç; Diğer
hr-HR: Vrsta širokog navoja: Oblik metka; Karbidni; Oblik dlijeta; Reže pri kontaktu; Hibridni; Šiljasti; Tanto; Oblik troakara; Ostalo
ru: Тип наконечника охотничьего лезвия: Пулевидный; Твердосплавный; Зубило; Плоский (cut-on-contact); Гибридный; Остроконечный; Танто; Троакар; Другое
ja: ブロードヘッドの先端タイプ: ブレット; 超硬合金 (カーバイド); チゼルチップ; カットオンコンタクト; ハイブリッド; ポインテッド; タントー; トロカールチップ; その他
vi: Loại đầu mũi tên: Hình đầu đạn; Carbide; Mũi đục; Cắt khi tiếp xúc; Lai; Nhọn; Kiểu Tanto; Mũi Trocar; Khác
hu: Vadászhegy csúcstípusa: Lövedék; Karbid; Vésőhegyű; Éles; Hibrid; Hegyes; Tantó; Trokár hegy; Egyéb
zh-TW: 寬頭箭頭尖端類型: 子彈頭; 碳化物; 鑿型頭; 接觸即割; 混合型; 尖頭; 短刀型 (Tanto); 穿刺針型 (Trocar); 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta lovske konice: Krogla; Karbid; Konica dleta; Z rezilom (cut-on-contact); Hibridno; Koničasto; Tanto; Trokar konica; Drugo
fr: Type de pointe de la pointe de chasse: Ogivale; Carbure; Pointe biseautée; Coupe au contact; Hybride; Pointue; Tanto; Pointe trocart; Autre
it: Tipo di punta larga: A proiettile; Carburo; Punta a scalpello; Da taglio all'impatto; Ibrida; Appuntita; Tanto; Punta trocar; Altro
pl: Typ końcówki grotu myśliwskiego: Pocisk; Z węglika spiekanego; Ścięty; Tnące przy kontakcie; Hybrydowy; Szpiczasty; Tanto; Trokar; Inny
bg-BG: Тип на върха на ловния връх: Куршум; Карбиден; Тип длето; Режещ при контакт; Хибриден; Заострен; Танто; Троакарен връх; Друго
zh-CN: 箭头类型: 子弹形; 碳化物; 凿形箭头; 触切式; 混合式; 尖形; 短刀形; 穿刺形; 其他
nl: Broadhead punttype: Kogel; Hardmetaal; Beitelpunt; Cut-on-contact; Hybride; Gepunt; Tanto; Trocar-punt; Overig
pt-BR: Tipo de ponta de caça: Bala; Carboneto; Ponta de formão; Corte ao contato; Híbrida; Pontuda; Tanto; Ponta trocarte; Outros
nb: Bredhodespisstype: Kule; Karbid; Meiselspiss; Skjærer ved kontakt; Hybrid; Spiss; Tanto; Trokarspiss; Annet
el: Τύπος άκρου ευρείας αιχμής: Σφαίρα; Καρβίδιο; Μύτη σμίλης; Επαφής και κοπής; Υβριδικό; Μυτερό; Τάντο; Μύτη trocar; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tip de vârf cu vârf lat: Glonț; Carbură; Vârf de daltă; Tăiere la contact; Hibrid; Ascuțit; Tanto; Vârf trocar; Altele
ko: 브로드헤드 팁 유형: 총알형; 카바이드; 치즐 팁; 컷 온 콘택트; 하이브리드; 포인티드; 탄토; 트로카 팁; 기타
lt-LT: Broadhead antgalio tipas: Kulkos formos; Karbidas; Kalto formos antgalis; Pjaunantis nuo kontakto; Hibridinis; Smailus; Tanto tipo; Trokaro formos antgalis; Kitas
sk-SK: Typ hrotu hlavy šípu: Guľka; Karbid; Hrot v tvare dláta; Rezná hrana; Hybridná; Špicatá; Tanto; Trokarový hrot; Iné
da: Type af spids på jagtspids: Kugle; Karbid; Mejselspids; Skærer ved kontakt; Hybrid; Spids; Tanto; Trokar-spids; Andet
sv: Typ av bredspets: Kula; Karbid; Mejselspets; Skärande spets; Hybrid; Spetsig; Tanto; Trokarspets; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de ponta de flecha: Bala; Carboneto; Ponta de cinzel; Corte no contacto; Híbrido; Pontiaguda; Tanto; Ponta trocarte; Outro
cs: Typ hrotu loveckého šípu (broadhead): Kulatý hrot; Karbidový hrot; Dlátovitý hrot; Průrazný hrot; Hybridní; Špičatý hrot; Tanto hrot; Trokarový hrot; Jiné